Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.270

Violence prevention training.

The superintendent of public instruction shall, to the extent funding is available, contract with school districts, educational service districts, and approved in-service providers to conduct training sessions for school certificated and classified employees in conflict resolution and other violence prevention topics. The training shall be developmentally and culturally appropriate for the school populations being served and be research based. The training shall not be based solely on providing materials, but also shall include techniques on imparting these skills to students. The training sessions shall be developed in coordination with school districts, the superintendent of public instruction, parents, law enforcement agencies, human services providers, and other interested parties. The training shall be offered to school districts and school staff requesting the training, and shall be made available at locations throughout the state.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 602.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.